District of Columbia statutes.
4-1451.07

Status report.

The Mayor shall submit a status report by January 1, 2011, and on January 1 of each year thereafter, to the Council, which shall include the:

(1)

Number of newborns surrendered;

(2)

Services provided to surrendered newborns;

(3)

Outcome of the care provided for each surrendered newborn; and

(4)

Number and disposition of cases of surrendered newborns.

History

May 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-158, § 107, 57 DCR 3000

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 107 of Newborn Safe Haven Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-321, March 1, 2010, 57 DCR 1842).